Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.251

Powers and duties of director—Administration of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 by the department.

The director may promulgate rules, make specific decisions, orders, and rulings, including demands and findings, and take other necessary action for the implementation and enforcement of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271. In the administration of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 the department shall not enter any controversy arising over work assignments with respect to the trades involved in the construction industry.

[ 2001 c 211 s 18; 1983 c 206 s 20; 1980 c 30 s 11. Formerly RCW 19.28.600.]